Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1563.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 1

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 707.1 of Title 22, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A subpoena issued by or on behalf of a defendant, as
authorized by Section 710 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to a
law enforcement agency, business, or commercial entity shall be
subject to the following provisions:
1. After an endorsed complaint, indictment, or information is
filed, a subpoena issued on behalf of or by a defendant to a law
enforcement agency may command the production of the following law
enforcement records made in connection with the particular case:
a. body camera videos,
b. vehicle-mounted camera videos,
c. traffic camera videos,
d. law enforcement incident reports, and
e. a recording of the administration of a sobriety test;
2. After an endorsed complaint, indictment, or information is
filed, a subpoena issued on behalf of or by a defendant to a
business or commercial entity may command the production of a
recording in the possession of the business or commercial entity,
which covers a reasonable period of time before, during, or after
the commission of the criminal act alleged in a complaint,
indictment, or information; and

ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 2

3. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to permit a
defendant to issue a subpoena for the purpose of obtaining
individual witness or victim testimony outside of a court hearing or
trial.
B. Any subpoena for a record that contains individual records
of persons, and the costs of copying, reproducing, or certifying
each individual record, may be assessed for each individual record
or portion thereof requested, as prescribed by state law.
Otherwise, a public body may charge a fee only for recovery of the
reasonable and direct costs of record copying or mechanical
reproduction and the actual personnel costs resulting from
redactions authorized by Section 2 of this act. In no instance
shall the record copying fee exceed twenty-five cents ($0.25) per
page for records having the dimensions of eight and one-half (8 1/2)
by fourteen (14) inches or smaller, or a maximum of One Dollar
($1.00) per copied page for a certified copy, and a recording
copying fee not more than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) per
recording.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 707.2 of Title 22, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Upon service of a subpoena by or on behalf of a defendant to
a law enforcement agency as authorized in Section 1 of this act, the
law enforcement agency receiving the subpoena may notify, in writing
ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 3

to t he defendant or his or her representative, that the subpoenaed
records would:
1. Violate any requirement to keep certain juvenile records
confidential as provided for in Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Include information that would materially compromise an
ongoing criminal investigation or ongoing criminal prosecution;
3. Undermine the assertion of a privilege to keep the identity
of an informant confidential as provided in Section 2510 of Title 12
of the Oklahoma Statutes; or
4. Require production of records or videos that fall outside
the scope permitted by Section 1 of this act.
B. Upon receiving notice by a law enforcement agency, the
defendant or his or her representative issuing the subpoena shall:
1. Inform the law enforcement agency of the desire to receive
the subpoenaed records with redactions or have the information
contained in paragraph 1, 2, or 3 of subsection A of this section
obscured; or
2. Notify the law enforcement agency and the prosecuting agency
of the application made to the court of competent jurisdiction for
the release of the unredacted or unobscured records and the date and
time of hearing on the application.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 707.3 of Title 22, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 4

A. Every subpoena issued on behalf of or by a defendant shall
state the name of the court from which it is issued and the title of
the action.
B. A witness shall be obligated upon service of a subpoena to
attend a trial or hearing at any place within the state.
C. The court clerk shall issue a subpoena, signed and sealed
but otherwise blank, to a party requesting it, who shall complete
the subpoena before service. As an officer of the court, an
attorney authorized to practice law in this state may also issue and
sign a subpoena on behalf of a court in this state.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 707.4 of Title 22, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A party or an attorney responsible for the issuance and service
of a subpoena shall take reasonable steps to avoid imposing undue
burden or expense on a person subject to the subpoena. The court on
behalf of which the subpoena was issued shall enforce such duty and
impose upon the party or attorney, or both, in breach of such duty
an appropriate sanction, which may include, but is not limited to,
lost earnings and reasonable attorney fees.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 707.5 of Title 22, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 5

On timely motion by the prosecution or a witness and after the
movant provides notice to the defendant or his or her representative
of the application and the date and time of hearing on the
application, the court on behalf of which a subpoena was issued
shall quash or modify the subpoena if it:
1. Fails to allow reasonable time for compliance;
2. Requires a person to travel to a place beyond the limits of
the county where the person resides or is served with the subpoena;
3. Subjects a person to undue burden; or
4. Has been shown by the objecting party that the subpoena
violates any provision of subsection A of Section 2 of this act.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 707.6 of Title 22, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Subpoenas issued in accordance with the provisions of Sections 1
through 3 of this act and Sections 708 and 712 of Title 22 of the
Oklahoma Statutes shall be considered separate and distinct from any
right or obligation provided for in Section 2002 of Title 22 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 708, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 708. A subpoena, authorized by the last four sections,
must provisions of Sections 704, 705, 706, and 707 of this title and

ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 6

Sect ions 1 through 3 of this act shall be substantially in the
following form:
IN THE NAME OF THE STATE OF
OKLAHOMA.
To ......... ,
Greeting: You are commanded to appear before C. D., a justice
of the peace judge of ........ at ....... (or the grand jury of the
county County of ......... or the district court of ......... county
County, or other location as the case may be specified), on the
........ (stating day and hour), and remain in attendance on and
call of said ........ from day to day and term to term until
lawfully discharged, as a witness in a criminal action prosecuted by
the State of Oklahoma against E. F. (or to testify as the case may
be).
SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 712, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 712. A. Service of subpoenas for witnesses in criminal
actions in the district courts of this state a subpoena upon a
person named therein shall be made in the same manner as in civil
actions pursuant to Section 2004.1 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma
Statutes by delivering or mailing a copy of the subpoena to such
person and, if the attendance of the person is demanded, by
tendering to that person the fees for one (1) day of attendance and
the mileage allowed by law. Service of a subpoena may be
ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 7

acco mplished by any person who is eighteen (18) years of age or
older.
B. Service of a subpoena by mail may be accomplished by mailing
a copy by certified mail with return receipt requested and delivery
restricted to the person named in the subpoena. The person serving
the subpoena shall make proof of service to the court promptly, and
in any event, before the witness is required to testify at the
hearing or trial. If service is made by a person other than a peace
officer, such person shall make an affidavit thereof. If service is
by mail, the person serving the subpoena shall show in the proof of
service the date and place of mailing and attach a copy of the
return receipt showing that the mailing was accepted. Failure to
make proof of service shall not affect the validity of the service,
but service of a subpoena by mail shall not be effective if the
mailing was not accepted by the person named in the subpoena. The
cost costs of service of subpoenas shall be borne by the parties
unless otherwise ordered by the court and shall be allowed whether
service is made by a peace officer or by any other person.
SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 715, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 715. A. No person is obliged to attend as a witness
before a court or magistrate outside the county where the witness
resides or is served with a subpoena, unless the judge of the court
in which the offense is triable, upon an affidavit of the district
ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 8

atto rney, or of the defendant or the defendant’s counsel, stating
that he or she believes that the evidence and attendance of the
witness is material and necessary, shall endorse on the subpoena an
order for the attendance of the witness.
B. The No court clerks clerk of this state shall not be subject
to subpoena in matters relating to court records unless the court
makes a specific finding that the appearance and testimony of the
court clerk are both material and necessary because of a written
objection to the introduction of certified documents court records
made by the defendant or other party prior to trial.
SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 716, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 716. Disobedience or failure by any person without
adequate excuse to obey a subpoena served upon himself or herself,
or a refusal to be sworn or to testify, may be punished by the court
or magistrate, as for deemed a criminal contempt, in the manner
provided in civil procedure of the court from which the subpoena was
issued.
SECTION 11. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.”





ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 9

Passed the Senate the 30th day of April, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives















ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 10

ENGR OSSED HOUSE
BILL NO. 1563 By: Duel of the House

and

Howard of the Senate



[ criminal procedure - criminal subpoenas - law
enforcement records – recordings - business or
commercial entities - notice - defendants –
information - witnesses - trials - hearings –
subpoenas - court clerks - attorneys – undue burden
– sanctions – form requirements - exemption -
criminal contempt penalty – codification -
effective date ]


BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 12. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 707.1 of Title 22, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A subpoena issued by or on behalf of a defendant, as
authorized by Section 710 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to a
law enforcement agency, business, or commercial entity shall be
subject to the following provisions:
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 1

1. After a complaint, indictment, or information is filed, a
subpoena issued on behalf of or by a defendant to a law enforcement
agency may command the production of the following law enforcement
records:
a. body camera videos,
b. vehicle mounted camera videos,
c. traffic camera videos,
d. law enforcement incident reports, and
e. recording of the administration of a sobriety test.
2. After a complaint, indictment, or information is filed, a
subpoena issued on behalf of or by a defendant to a business or
commercial entity may command the production of a recording in the
possession of said business or commercial entity, which covers a
reasonable period of time before, during, or after the commission of
the act alleged in a complaint, indictment, or information.
B. Any subpoena for a record which contains individual records
of persons, and the costs of copying, reproducing, or certifying
each individual record otherwise prescribed by state law, may be
assessed for each individual record or portion thereof requested, as
prescribed by state law. Otherwise, a public body may charge a fee
only for recovery of the reasonable, direct costs of record copying
or mechanical reproduction. In no instance shall the record copying
fee exceed twenty-five cents ($0.25) per page for records having the
dimensions of eight and one-half (8 1/2) by fourteen (14) inches or
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 2

smal ler, or a maximum of One Dollar ($1.00) per copied page for a
certified copy, and a recording copying fee of not more than Twenty-
five Dollars ($25.00) per recording.
SECTION 13. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 707.2 of Title 22, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Upon service of a subpoena by or on behalf of a defendant to
a law enforcement agency authorized in Section 1 of this act, such
law enforcement agency receiving the subpoena may notify, in writing
to the defendant or his or her representative, that the subpoenaed
records:
1. Would undermine any requirement to keep certain juvenile
records confidential as provided for in Title 10A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
2. Would include information that would materially compromise
an ongoing criminal investigation or ongoing criminal prosecution;
or
3. Would undermine the assertion of a privilege to keep the
identity of an informer confidential, as provided for in Section
2510 of Title 12 of the of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Upon receiving notice by a law enforcement agency, the
defendant or his or her representative issuing the subpoena shall:
1. Inform the law enforcement agency of the desire to receive
the subpoenaed records with redactions or have the information
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 3

cont ained in paragraph 1, 2, or 3 of subsection A of this section
obscured; or
2. Notify the law enforcement agency of the application made to
the court of competent jurisdiction for the release of the
unredacted or obscured records.
SECTION 14. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 707.3 of Title 22, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Every subpoena issued on behalf of or by a defendant shall
state the name of the court from which it is issued and the title of
the action.
B. A witness shall be obligated upon service of a subpoena to
attend a trial or hearing at any place within the state.
C. The court clerk shall issue a subpoena, signed and sealed
but otherwise in blank, to a party requesting it, who shall complete
the subpoena before service. As an officer of the court, an
attorney authorized to practice law in this state may also issue and
sign a subpoena on behalf of a court in this state.
SECTION 15. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 707.4 of Title 22, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A party or an attorney responsible for the issuance and service
of a subpoena shall take reasonable steps to avoid imposing undue
burden or expense on a person subject to that subpoena. The court
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 4

on b ehalf of which the subpoena was issued shall enforce this duty
and impose upon the party or attorney, or both, in breach of this
duty an appropriate sanction, which may include, but is not limited
to, lost earnings and a reasonable attorney fee.
SECTION 16. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 707.5 of Title 22, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
On timely motion, the court on behalf of which a subpoena was
issued shall quash or modify the subpoena if it:
1. Fails to allow reasonable time for compliance;
2. Requires a person to travel to a place beyond the limits of
the county where the person resides or is served with the subpoena;
or
3. Subjects a person to undue burden.
SECTION 17. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 707.6 of Title 22, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Subpoenas issued in accordance with the provisions of Sections 1
through 3 of this act and Sections 708 and 712 of Title 22 of the
Oklahoma Statutes shall be considered separate and distinct from any
right or obligation provided for in Section 2002 of Title 22 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 18. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 708, is
amended to read as follows:
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 5

Section 708. A subpoena, authorized by the last four sections,
provisions of Sections 704, 705, 706, and 707 of this title and
Section 1 of this act must be substantially in the following form:
IN THE NAME OF THE STATE OF
OKLAHOMA.
To ......... ,
Greeting: You are commanded to appear before C. D., a justice
of the peace of ........ at ....... (or the grand jury of the county
County of ......... or the district court of ......... county
County, or other location as the case may be specified), on the
........ (stating day and hour), and remain in attendance on and
call of said ........ from day to day and term to term until
lawfully discharged, as a witness in a criminal action prosecuted by
the State of Oklahoma against E. F. (or to testify as the case may
be).
SECTION 19. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 712, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 712. A. Service of subpoenas for witnesses in criminal
actions in the district courts of this state a subpoena upon a
person named therein shall be made in the same manner as in civil
actions pursuant to Section 2004.1 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma
Statutes by delivering or mailing a copy thereof to such person and,
if the attendance of the person is demanded, by tendering to that
person the fees for one (1) day of attendance and the mileage
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 6

allo wed by law. Service of a subpoena may be accomplished by any
person who is eighteen (18) years of age or older.
B. Service of a subpoena by mail may be accomplished by mailing
a copy by certified mail with return receipt requested and delivery
restricted to the person named in the subpoena. The person serving
the subpoena shall make proof of service to the court promptly, and
in any event, before the witness is required to testify at the
hearing or trial. If service is made by a person other than a peace
officer, such person shall make affidavit thereof. If service is by
mail, the person serving the subpoena shall show in the proof of
service the date and place of mailing and attach a copy of the
return receipt showing that the mailing was accepted. Failure to
make proof of service does not affect the validity of the service,
but service of a subpoena by mail shall not be effective if the
mailing was not accepted by the person named in the subpoena. The
cost costs of service of subpoenas shall be borne by the parties
unless otherwise ordered by the court and shall be allowed whether
service is made by a peace officer or by any other person.
SECTION 20. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 715, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 715. A. No person is obliged to attend as a witness
before a court or magistrate outside the county where the witness
resides or is served with a subpoena, unless the judge of the court
in which the offense is triable, upon an affidavit of the district
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 7

atto rney, or of the defendant or the defendant's counsel, stating
that he or she believes that the evidence and attendance of the
witness is material and necessary, shall endorse on the subpoena an
order for the attendance of the witness.
B. The court clerks of this state shall not be subject to
subpoena in matters relating to court records unless the court makes
a specific finding that the appearance and testimony of the court
clerk are both material and necessary because of a written objection
to the introduction of certified documents court records made by the
defendant or other party prior to trial.
SECTION 21. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 716, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 716. Disobedience or failure by any person without
adequate excuse to obey a subpoena served upon himself or herself,
or a refusal to be sworn or to testify, may be punished by the court
or magistrate, as for deemed a criminal contempt, in the manner
provided in civil procedure of the court from which the subpoena was
issued.
SECTION 22. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.





ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 8

Passed the House of Representatives the 27th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 1563 Page 9